Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4868.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1153a. (1) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate funds each fiscal year to school districts for the purpose of assisting English language learners as described in section 41 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1641. For a school district to be eligible to receive funding under this section, the school district must administer to English language learners the English language proficiency assessment known as the "WIDA ACCESS for English language learners" or the "WIDA Alternate ACCESS". (2) The funding allocated to eligible school districts under subsection (1) must be distributed based on the number of full-time equivalent English language learners as follows: (a) An amount equal to 75% of the target foundation allowance per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 1.0 and 1.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. (b) An amount equal to 50% of the target foundation allowance per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 2.0 and 2.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. (c) An amount equal to 35% of the target foundation allowance per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 3.0 and 3.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment.